Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.425

False advertisements.

No publisher, radio and television broadcast licensee, advertising agency, or agency or medium for the dissemination of an advertisement, except the grower, packer, distributor, or seller of the article to which the advertisement relates, shall be subject to the penalties of RCW 15.13.490(2) by reason of dissemination of any false advertisement, unless the person has refused on the request of the director to furnish the name and address of the grower, packer, distributor, seller, or advertising agency in the state of Washington, who caused dissemination of the false advertisement.

[ 2000 c 144 s 21; 1993 c 120 s 13.]